District of Columbia statutes.
23-1909

Sexual assault victim advocate.

(a)

(1)

DC SANE Program participants, through established DC SANE protocol, shall summon a sexual assault victim advocate to the hospital before the commencement of any medical, evidentiary, or physical examination arising out of a sexual assault.

(2)

The sexual assault victim advocate shall inform the sexual assault victim of the right to have a sexual assault victim advocate present in all examinations and in-person interviews, even if the sexual assault victim has previously declined an advocate.

(b)

Law enforcement shall ensure that a sexual assault victim advocate is present before the commencement of any in-person interview with the sexual assault victim.

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 101(c), 61 DCR 5913